New Jersey, session 221, S3373.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    A long-term care facility shall post on its Internet website information regarding the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, which shall include information on the general duties of the ombudsman, the role of the ombudsman in advocating for the residents of the long-term care facility, and the ombudsmans contact information. 2.    The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.